Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0055.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 part 1 line-item appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023-2024 Sec. 101. There is appropriated for various state departments and agencies and the legislative branch to supplement 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 appropriations for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2024, from the following funds: APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 165,623,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 400,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 165,223,700 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 82,719,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 10,450,000 Total private revenues 50,000 Total other state restricted revenues 10,504,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 61,500,000 Sec. 102. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,700,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,700,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 1,700,000 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Prosecutorial and detainer expenses $ (2,900,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (2,900,000) Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ (2,900,000) (3) OFFENDER SUCCESS ADMINISTRATION Community corrections comprehensive plans and services $ (600,000) Probation residential services (1,900,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (2,500,000) Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ (2,500,000) (4) CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES ADMINISTRATION Intelligence unit $ (1,900,000) Prison food service (800,000) Transportation 2,700,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (5) HEALTH CARE Clinical complexes $ 18,500,000 Prisoner health care services (3,000,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 15,500,000 Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ 15,500,000 (6) CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES Alger Correctional Facility - Munising $ (1,000,000) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Baraga Correctional Facility - Baraga (4,000,000) Detroit Detention Center 1,700,000 Earnest C. Brooks Correctional Facility - Muskegon 600,000 G. Robert Cotton Correctional Facility - Jackson (2,600,000) Kinross Correctional Facility - Kincheloe (2,000,000) Lakeland Correctional Facility - Coldwater 400,000 Macomb Correctional Facility ï¿½ New Haven 600,000 Marquette Branch Prison ï¿½ Marquette (1,500,000) Muskegon Correctional Facility - Muskegon 400,000 Parnall Correctional Facility - Jackson 600,000 Special Alternative Incarceration Program - Jackson (1,300,000) Southern region administration and support (300,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION (8,400,000) Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Local funds 1,700,000 State general fund/general purpose (10,100,000) Sec. 103. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 145,813,700 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 50,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 145,763,700 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 71,984,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 8,750,000 Total private revenues 50,000 Total other state restricted revenues 9,979,700 State general fund/general purpose $ 55,000,000 (2) CHILD SUPPORT ENFORCEMENT State disbursement unit $ (1,000,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (1,000,000) Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ (1,000,000) (3) CHILDREN'S SERVICES AGENCY ï¿½ CHILD WELFARE Adoption subsidies $ 1,700,000 Child care fund 37,500,000 Child welfare medical/psychiatric evaluations (1,500,000) Family preservation programs (4,856,500) Foster care payments 3,550,000 Guardianship assistance program 200,000 Raise the age (3,000,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 33,593,500 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 500,000 Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 13,926,800 Special revenue funds: Local funds - county chargeback 8,500,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Private - collections 50,000 Total other state restricted revenues 2,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 8,616,700 (4) PUBLIC ASSISTANCE Family independence program $ 2,970,300 Indigent burial (1,175,000) Low-income energy assistance program (18,000,000) State disability assistance payments 200,000 State supplementation (1,000,000) State supplementation administration 75,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (16,929,700) Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families (18,000,000) Special revenue funds: Supplemental security income recoveries 3,970,300 State general fund/general purpose $ (2,900,000) (5) LOCAL OFFICE OPERATIONS AND SUPPORT SERVICES Donated funds positions $ 250,000 Electronic benefit transfer (1,000,000) Food assistance reinvestment (5,400,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (6,150,000) Appropriated from: Special revenues funds: Local funds ï¿½ donated funds 250,000 State general fund/general purpose $ (6,400,000) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 (6) DISABILITY DETERMINATION SERVICES Disability determination operations $ (1,000,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (1,000,000) Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ (1,000,000) (7) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH PROGRAM ADMINISTRATION AND SPECIAL PROJECTS Community substance use disorder prevention, education, and treatment $ (2,500,000) Family support subsidy 73,200 Mental health diversion council (1,000,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (3,426,800) Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Social security act, temporary assistance for needy families 73,200 State general fund/general purpose $ (3,500,000) (8) BEHAVIORAL HEALTH SERVICES Autism services $ 23,000,000 Behavioral health community supports and services (25,675,000) Certified community behavioral health clinic demonstration 45,000,000 Federal mental health block grant 1,900,000 Health homes (25,616,700) Healthy Michigan plan ï¿½ behavioral health (22,700,000) Medicaid mental health services (15,690,200) Medicaid substance use disorder services (580,000) 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Nursing home PAS/ARR-OBRA 1,775,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (18,586,900) Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 14,309,800 State general fund/general purpose $ (32,896,700) (9) STATE PSYCHIATRIC HOSPITALS AND FORENSIC MENTAL HEALTH SERVICES Caro Regional Mental Health Center ï¿½ psychiatric hospital - adult $ 3,509,400 Center for forensic psychiatry 8,500,000 Hawthorn Center ï¿½ psychiatric hospital ï¿½ children and adolescents (1,000,000) Kalamazoo Psychiatric Hospital - adult (4,000,000) Revenue recapture (1,000,000) Walter P. Reuther Psychiatric Hospital ï¿½ adult, children, and adolescents (3,000,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,009,400 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 4,009,400 State general fund/general purpose $ (1,000,000) (10) EPIDEMIOLOGY, EMERGENCY MEDICAL SERVICES, AND LABORATORY Laboratory services $ 50,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 50,000 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDG from department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy 50,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (11) LOCAL HEALTH AND ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES Chronic disease control and health promotion administration $ (700,000) Essential local public health services (1,000,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (1,700,000) Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ (1,700,000) (12) FAMILY HEALTH SERVICES Prenatal care outreach and service delivery support $ (4,500,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (4,500,000) Appropriated from: State general fund/general purpose $ (4,500,000) (13) CHILDREN'S SPECIAL HEALTH CARE SERVICES Medical care and treatment 28,000,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 28,000,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Total other federal revenues 28,000,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (14) AGING SERVICES Community services $ (1,000,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (1,000,000) Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ (1,000,000) (15) HEALTH SERVICES Adult home help services $ 9,716,400 Ambulance services 3,000,000 Auxiliary medical services 700,000 Dental services 2,800,000 Federal Medicare pharmaceutical program 1,500,000 Health plan services 55,000,000 Healthy Michigan plan (187,760,000) Home health services 21,300 Hospice services (7,000,000) Hospital services and therapy (28,500,000) Integrated care organizations 2,210,300 Long-term care services 267,700,000 Maternal and child health 5,000,000 Medicaid home- and community-based services waiver 25,737,000 Medicare premium payments (23,000,000) Personal care services 379,200 Pharmaceutical services (22,500,000) Physician services 16,000,000 Plan first 1,000,000 Program of all-inclusive care for the elderly 400,000 Special Medicaid reimbursement 12,800,000 Transportation 250,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 135,454,200 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total other federal revenues 33,174,200 State general fund/general purpose $ 102,280,000 Sec. 104. DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) DEPARTMENTAL ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT Department services $ 525,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 525,000 Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Consumer finance fees 40,000 Insurance bureau fund 255,000 Insurance licensing and regulation fees 140,000 MBLSLA fund 90,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) INSURANCE AND FINANCIAL SERVICES REGULATION 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Consumer services and protection $ 1,615,000 Financial institutions evaluation (1,120,000) Insurance evaluation (1,020,000) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (525,000) Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Consumer finance fees (525,000) Credit union fees (175,000) Insurance bureau fund 1,615,000 Insurance continuing education fees (260,000) Insurance licensing and regulation fees (820,000) MBLSLA fund (310,000) Multiple employer welfare arrangement (50,000) State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 105. DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND ECONOMIC OPPORTUNITY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,500,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,500,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 2,500,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) REHABILITATION SERVICES Michigan rehabilitation services $ 2,500,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 2,500,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DED, vocational rehabilitation and independent living 2,500,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 106. DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AND VETERANS AFFAIRS (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 14,510,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 14,510,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 8,010,000 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 6,500,000 (2) MILITARY Headquarters and armories $ 200,000 Michigan youth challeNGe academy 810,000 Military training sites and support facilities 400,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 1,410,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: DOD-DOA-NGB 1,410,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) MICHIGAN VETERANS' FACILITY AUTHORITY Chesterfield Township home for veterans $ 5,885,000 D.J. Jacobetti home for veterans 1,210,000 Grand Rapids home for veterans 4,995,000 Michigan veteran homes administration 860,000 Veterans cemetery 150,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 13,100,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: USDVA - VHA 6,600,000 HHS-HCFA, Medicare, hospital insurance 0 HHS-HCFA, title XIX, Medicaid 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 6,500,000 Sec. 107. DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 225,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 225,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 225,000 Special revenue funds: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) PARKS AND RECREATION DIVISION Recreational boating $ 225,000 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 225,000 Appropriated from: Federal revenues: Michigan state waterways fund, federal 225,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 108. DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 875,000 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 350,000 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 525,000 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 525,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) LAW ENFORCEMENT SERVICES Grants and community services $ 525,000 Training operations 350,000 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 875,000 Appropriated from: Interdepartmental grant revenues: IDT, Michigan justice training fund 350,000 Special revenue funds: Auto theft prevention fund 525,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 Sec. 109. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY (1) APPROPRIATION SUMMARY GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Interdepartmental grant revenues: Total interdepartmental grants and intradepartmental transfers 0 ADJUSTED GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 0 Federal revenues: Total federal revenues 0 Special revenue funds: Total local revenues 0 Total private revenues 0 Total other state restricted revenues 0 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (2) REVENUE SHARING City, village, and township revenue sharing $ (253,900) County revenue sharing (304,700) Financially distressed cities, villages, or townships 561,600 GROSS APPROPRIATION $ 3,000 Appropriated from: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 Special revenue funds: Sales tax 3,000 State general fund/general purpose $ 0 (3) ONE-TIME APPROPRIATIONS City, village, and township revenue sharing $ (2,200) County revenue sharing (800) GROSS APPROPRIATION $ (3,000) Appropriated from: Special revenue funds: Sales tax (3,000) State general fund/general purpose $ 0 part 2 provisions concerning appropriations FOR FISCAL YEAR 2023-2024 general sections Sec. 201. Pursuant to section 30 of article IX of the state constitution of 1963, total state spending from state sources under part 1 for the fiscal year ending September 30, 2024 is $74,004,700.00 and total state spending from state sources to be paid to local units of government is $48,623,300.00. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES Adult home help services $ 1,300 Ambulance services 101,800 Autism services 7,411,800 Caro Regional Mental Health Center - psychiatric hospital - adult 10,500 Center for forensic psychiatry 55,800 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Certified community behavioral health clinic demonstration 9,900,000 Child care fund 19,875,000 Dental services 7,400 Foster care payments 36,000 Long-term care services 9,681,800 Medicaid home and community-based services waiver 736,300 Medical care and treatment 74,900 Nursing home PAS/ARR-OBRA 522,200 Personal care services 1,100 Physician services 195,100 State disability assistance payments 6,400 Transportation 5,900 Subtotal $ 48,623,300 DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY City, village, and township revenue sharing $ (256,100) County revenue sharing (305,500) Financially distressed cities, villages, or townships 561,600 Subtotal $ 0 TOTAL $ 48,623,300 Sec. 202. The appropriations made and expenditures authorized under this part and part 1 and the departments, commissions, boards, offices, and programs for which appropriations are made under this part and part 1 are subject to the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1101 to 18.1594. Sec. 203. Funds appropriated in part 1 must be allocated and expended in a manner consistent with federal rules and regulations. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Sec. 204. Funds appropriated in part 1 are subject to applicable federal audit and reporting requirements. Prompt action shall be taken if instances of noncompliance are identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding. If any instance of noncompliance is identified, including noncompliance identified in an audit finding, the state budget director shall take necessary and immediate action to rectify it. The state budget director shall notify the senate and house appropriations committees and the senate and house fiscal agencies when an instance of noncompliance is identified. Sec. 205. The state budget director shall report on the status of funds appropriated in part 1, and all funds appropriated related to the coronavirus relief effort, to the senate and house appropriations committees and the senate and house fiscal agencies on a monthly basis until all funds are exhausted. DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS Sec. 301. In addition to the funds appropriated in part 1, the department may receive and expend revenues received through contractual agreements for contraband prevention, intelligence operations, and facility security projects. Revenues collected under this section that are unexpended at the close of the fiscal year do not lapse to the general fund and must be carried forward to the subsequent fiscal year. DEPARTMENT OF TREASURY Sec. 501. (1) The funds appropriated in part 1 for financially distressed cities, villages, or townships shall be granted by the department of treasury to cities, villages, and townships that have 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 1 or more conditions that indicate probable financial distress, as determined by the department of treasury. A city, village, or township with 1 or more conditions that indicate probable financial distress may apply in a manner determined by the department of treasury for a grant to pay for specific projects or services that move the city, village, or township toward financial stability. Grants are to be used for specific projects or services that move the city, village, or township toward financial stability. The city, village, or township must use the grants under this section to make payments to reduce unfunded accrued liability; to repair or replace critical infrastructure and equipment owned or maintained by the city, village, or township; to reduce debt obligations; or for costs associated with a transition to shared services with another jurisdiction; or to administer other projects that move the city, village, or township toward financial stability. The department of treasury shall award not more than $2,000,000.00 to any city, village, or township under this section. (2) The department of treasury shall submit a report by March 31 that includes a list by grant recipient of the date each grant was approved, the amount of the grant, and a description of the project or projects that will be paid by the grant. (3) The unexpended funds appropriated in part 1 for financially distressed cities, villages, or townships are designated as a work project appropriation, and any unencumbered or unallotted funds shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal year and shall be available for expenditure for projects under this section until the projects have been completed. The following is in compliance with section 451a of the management and budget act, 1984 PA 431, MCL 18.1451a: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 (a) The purpose of the project is to provide assistance to financially distressed cities, villages, and townships under this section. (b) The projects will be accomplished by grants to cities, villages, and townships approved by the department of treasury. (c) The total estimated cost is $561,600.00. (d) The tentative completion date is September 30, 2028.